New York, session 2025-2026, A10673.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (a) of paragraph p of subdivision 4 of section 2 1950 of the education law, as amended by chapter 374 of the laws of 3 2014, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) To rent suitable land, classrooms, offices or buildings upon or in 5 which to maintain and conduct such cooperative educational services and 6 administrative offices for a period not to exceed [ten] twenty years 7 [for leases entered into with public entities and twenty years for leas- 8 es entered into with non-public entities] and to improve, alter, equip 9 and furnish such land, classrooms, offices or buildings in a suitable 10 manner for such purposes, provided that: (1) before executing any lease, 11 the board shall adopt a resolution determining that such agreement is in 12 the best financial interests of the supervisory district and stating the 13 basis of that determination; (2) the rental payment shall not be more 14 than the fair market value as determined by the board and provided to 15 the commissioner; (3) The board discloses any conflict of interest 16 pursuant to subparagraph (c) of this paragraph, or any other potential 17 or perceived conflict of interest, to the commissioner, and in the event 18 of a conflict of interest or a potential or perceived conflict of inter- 19 est, provides detailed documentation to the commissioner demonstrating 20 that the cost of the lease is not more than fair market value; and (4) 21 upon the consent of the commissioner, renewal of such lease may be made 22 for a period of up to ten years. Nothing contained herein shall prevent 23 the board from entering into a lease agreement which provides for the 24 cancellation of the same by such board upon: (i) a substantial increase 25 or decrease in pupil enrollment; or (ii) a substantial change in the 26 needs and requirements of a board of cooperative educational services 27 with respect to facilities; or (iii) any other change which substantial- 28 ly affects the needs or requirements of a board of cooperative educa- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14261-03-6 A. 10673 2 1 tional services or the community in which it is located. No lease or 2 other contract for the occupancy of such land, classrooms, offices or 3 buildings shall be enforceable against the board of cooperative educa- 4 tional services unless and until the same shall have been approved in 5 writing by the commissioner. In the case of a lease longer than ten 6 years, the commissioner's written approval must include a finding that 7 the proposed lease complies with all requirements of this paragraph and 8 would be more cost-effective than a lease of ten years or fewer. 9 § 2. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1, and subdivisions 3 and 5 of 10 section 403-a of the education law, paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 as 11 amended and subdivision 5 as added by chapter 459 of the laws of 1979 12 and subdivision 3 as amended by chapter 460 of the laws of 1979, are 13 amended to read as follows: 14 (b) The term of the lease shall not exceed ten years, except when such 15 lease is established in accordance with subparagraph (a) of paragraph p 16 of subdivision four of section nineteen hundred fifty of this chapter, 17 such lease term shall not exceed twenty years. 18 3. The board of education or trustees of a school district are hereby 19 authorized to lease real property upon such terms and conditions as the 20 board of education or trustees may deem appropriate to any person, part- 21 nership or corporation such board of education or trustees shall have 22 determined who will provide the most benefit to the school district for 23 periods not to exceed ten years, provided however that property leased 24 in accordance with subparagraph (a) of paragraph p of subdivision four 25 of section nineteen hundred fifty of this chapter may exceed a period of 26 ten years. Such leases may also be renewed for a period of up to ten 27 years upon the consent of the commissioner. 28 5. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of subdivision one 29 hereof the board of education or trustees of a school district are here- 30 by authorized to enter into a lease agreement in accordance with the 31 provisions of this section for a period in excess of ten years subject, 32 however, to voter approval by referendum. Provided however, leases 33 established in accordance with subparagraph (a) of paragraph p of subdi- 34 vision four of section nineteen hundred fifty of this chapter may exceed 35 a period of ten years without voter approval by referendum; such leases 36 shall not exceed a period of twenty years. 37 § 3. Subdivision (a) of section 72-h of the general municipal law, as 38 amended by chapter 562 of the laws of 1990, is amended to read as 39 follows: 40 (a) Notwithstanding any provision of any general, special or local law 41 or of any charter, the supervisors of a county, the town board of a 42 town, the board of trustees of a village, the board of fire commission- 43 ers of a fire district, the board of estimate of a city, or if there be 44 none the local legislative body of such city, and, in a city having a 45 population of one million or more, the mayor, subject to disapproval by 46 the council within thirty days following receipt of notice of the 47 approval of the mayor, may sell, transfer or lease to or exchange with 48 any municipal corporation or municipal corporations, school district, 49 board of cooperative educational services, fire district, the state of 50 New York, or the government of the United States and any agency or 51 department thereof, either without consideration or for such consider- 52 ation and upon such terms and conditions as shall be approved by such 53 officer or body, any real property owned by such county, town, village, 54 fire district or city; and any municipal corporation or fire district 55 may acquire or lease such real property as provided in this section. The 56 term of any lease entered into pursuant to the provisions of this A. 10673 3 1 section shall not exceed ten years [but nothing], unless the lease is 2 established in accordance with subparagraph (a) of paragraph p of subdi- 3 vision four of section nineteen hundred fifty of the education law in 4 which case, such lease term shall not exceed twenty years. Nothing here- 5 in contained shall prevent the renewal of any such lease. 6 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 7 the amendments to subparagraph (a) of paragraph p of subdivision 4 of 8 section 1950 of the education law made by section one of this act shall 9 not affect the expiration of such subparagraph and shall be deemed to 10 expire therewith.